Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-402
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Online Notary Public Act:

(1) Communication technology means an electronic device or process that allows an online notary public and an individual who is not in the physical presence of the online notary public to communicate with each other simultaneously by sight and sound;

(2) Credential analysis means a process or service operating according to criteria approved by the Secretary of State through which a third person affirms the validity of a government-issued identification credential through review of public and proprietary data sources;

(3) Electronic means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

(4) Electronic document means information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means;

(5) Electronic signature means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic document;

(6) Identity proofing means a process or service operating according to criteria approved by the Secretary of State through which a third person affirms the identity of an individual through review of personal information from public or proprietary data sources;

(7) Online notarial act means the performance by an online notary public of a function authorized under section 64-408 that is performed by means of communication technology that meets the standards developed under section 64-407;

(8) Online notarial certificate means the portion of a notarized electronic document that is completed by an online notary public and that contains the following:

(a) The online notary public's electronic signature, online notary seal, title, and commission expiration date;

(b) Other required information concerning the date and place of the online notarial act; and

(c) The completed wording of one of the following notarial certificates: (i) Acknowledgment, (ii) jurat, (iii) verification of proof, or (iv) oath or affirmation;

(9) Online notary public means a notary public registered with the Secretary of State who has the authority to perform online notarial acts under the Online Notary Public Act;

(10) Online notary seal means information within a notarized electronic document that confirms the online notary public's name, jurisdiction, identifying number, and commission expiration date and generally corresponds to the data in notary seals used on paper documents;

(11) Online notary solution provider means a provider of any credential analysis, identity proofing, online notary seals, electronic signatures, or communication technology;

(12) Personal knowledge or personally known means familiarity with an individual resulting from interactions with that individual over a period of time sufficient to dispel any reasonable uncertainty that the individual has the identity claimed;

(13) Principal means an individual:

(a) Whose electronic signature is notarized in an online notarial act; or

(b) Taking an oath or affirmation from the online notary public other than in the capacity of a witness for the online notarial act; and

(14) Remote presentation means transmission to the online notary public through communication technology of an image of a government-issued identification credential that is of sufficient quality to enable the online notary public to:

(a) Identify the individual seeking the online notary public's services; and

(b) Perform credential analysis.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 2.